Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 7. Egg Marketing.

§§ 69-7-301 through 69-7-319.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1972, ch. 532, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§69-7-301. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.19; Laws, 1966, ch. 223, § 9]

§69-7-303. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.11; Laws, 1966, ch. 233, § 1]

§69-7-305. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.12; Laws, 1966, ch. 223, § 2]

§69-7-307. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.13; Laws, 1966, ch. 223, § 3]

§69-7-309. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.14; Laws, 1966, ch. 223, § 4]

§69-7-311. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.16; Laws, 1966, ch. 223, § 6]

§69-7-313. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.17; Laws, 1966, ch. 223, § 7]

§69-7-315. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.18; Laws, 1966, ch. 223, § 8]

§69-7-317. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.15; Laws, 1966, ch. 223, § 5]

§69-7-319. [Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.20; Laws, 1966, ch. 223, § 10]

§ 69-7-321.
Producers selling own production exempt from article; exemptions under federal “Eggs Products Inspection Act”.

Producers selling eggs of their own production, when offered on their own premises, or selling less than six (6) dozen eggs per week, are exempt from the provisions of this article.

All eggs, egg products, egg handlers and egg producers which are exempt under the provisions of U. S. Public Law 91-597, commonly referred to as the “Egg Products Inspection Act”, or the regulations pertaining thereto, shall likewise be exempt from the provisions of this article to the same extent that such eggs, egg products, egg handlers, and egg producers are exempt from said Public Law 91-597 and the regulations pertaining thereto.

The name and address of the producer, packer or distributor shall appear on the container.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.39; Laws, 1972, ch. 532, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 69-7-323.
Minimum requirements for eggs offered for sale.

No person, firm, organization or corporation shall sell, offer for sale, or advertise for sale shell eggs that do not meet the minimum requirements for U. S. Consumer Grade AA, Grade A, or Grade B. Any change in the U. S. standards of quality for individual eggs made by the U. S. Department of Agriculture not conforming to the above designated standards shall be adopted in lieu of the above designated standards.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.31; Laws, 1972, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 69-7-325.
Weight and size requirements of eggs.

The net weight and size requirements that are now or may hereafter be established by the U. S. Department of Agriculture for shell eggs shall apply to all eggs sold, offered for sale or advertised for sale by any person, firm, organization or corporation. The grade and size shall appear in all advertisements.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.32; Laws, 1972, ch. 532, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 69-7-327.
Egg marketing containers to describe contents.

Any container or subcontainer in which eggs are marketed to consumers shall bear on the outside portion of the container, but shall not be limited to, the following:

The applicable consumer grade provided for in this article.

The applicable size or weight class provided for in this article.

The word “eggs.”

The numerical count of the contents.

The name and address of the producer, packer or distributor.

The date the eggs were graded applied legibly to the carton or on the tape used to seal the carton. Such date shall be expressed as the consecutive day of the year.

The words “keep refrigerated” or words of similar meaning.

Words and numerals used to designate the grade and size shall be in clearly legible bold-faced type at least three-eighths (3/8) inch in height.

Any person intending to reuse a carton shall obscure any inappropriate labeling thereon and relabel the carton in accordance with this section prior to refilling the carton with eggs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.33; Laws, 1972, ch. 532, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 371, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 69-7-329.
Marketing agents; maintenance of egg handling facilities.

Any person, business, cooperative, partnership, corporation or the like engaged in the marketing, processing, transporting, storing, displaying for sale or selling of eggs shall, in addition to maintaining all such egg handling facilities in a manner commensurate with laws governing food establishments, keep the eggs at an ambient temperature no greater than forty-five (45) degrees Fahrenheit.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.34; Laws, 1972, ch. 532, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 371, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 69-7-331.
Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce and his agents authorized to enter premises where eggs are sold.

In carrying out the provisions of this article, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, his employees or agents are authorized to enter, on any business day, during the usual hours of business, any store, market or any other building or place where eggs are sold or offered for sale and to make such examination as is necessary to determine the quality and size of eggs sold or offered for sale.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.36; Laws, 1972, ch. 532, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 69-7-333.
Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce to enforce article.

The powers of enforcement of this article shall be vested in the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.37; Laws, 1972, ch. 532, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 69-7-335.
Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce to promulgate regulations.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce of Mississippi is authorized to make and promulgate such regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.38; Laws, 1972, ch. 532, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 69-7-337.
Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce may issue “stop sale order.”

If an authorized representative of the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce shall determine, after inspection, that any lot of eggs is in violation of this article, he may issue a “stop sale order” as to such lot or lots of eggs and forthwith notify the owner or custodian of such eggs. Such order shall specify the reason for its issuance. A stop sale order shall prohibit the further marketing of the eggs subject to it until such eggs are released by the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce or his duly authorized agent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.35; Laws, 1972, ch. 532, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 69-7-339.
Penalties for violations.

Every person, firm, corporation or organization who by himself or itself, or by his or its agents or employees violates any of the provisions of this article, or the regulations made under this article for carrying out its provisions, or who fails or refuses to comply with any of the requirements of this article, or who willfully interferes with the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, his employees or agents in the carrying out of his duties prescribed in this article, shall for each offense be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) nor less than Five Dollars ($5.00) for the first offense, not exceeding Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for the second, nor exceeding Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) nor less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for the third and all following offenses, and all costs for each and every offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-30.40; Laws, 1972, ch. 532, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1972.